Alaska statutes. Title 26. Military Affairs, Veterans, Disasters, and Aerospace.
Article 1. Alaska Disaster Act.

Administrative Code. —

For disaster assistance programs, see 6 AAC 94.

Sec. 26.23.010.
Purposes.

The purposes of this chapter are to

reduce the vulnerability of people and communities of this state to damage, injury, and loss of life and property resulting from a disaster;

prepare for the prompt and efficient rescue, care, and treatment of persons victimized or threatened by a disaster;

provide a setting conducive to the rapid and orderly start of rehabilitation of persons and restoration of property affected by a disaster;

clarify and strengthen the roles of the governor, state agencies, and local governments in prevention of, preparation for, response to and recovery from a disaster;

authorize and provide for cooperation in disaster prevention, preparedness, response, and recovery;

authorize and provide for the coordination of activities relating to disaster prevention, preparedness, response, and recovery by agencies and officers of the state, and similar state-local, inter-state, federal-state, and foreign activities in which the state and its political subdivisions may participate; and

assist in the prevention of disasters caused or aggravated by inadequate planning for, and regulation of, public and private facilities and land use.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1977)

Sec. 26.23.020.
The governor and disaster emergencies.

The governor is responsible for meeting the dangers presented by disasters to the state and its people.

The governor may issue orders, proclamations, and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, and amend or rescind them. These orders, proclamations, and regulations have the force of law.

If the governor finds that a disaster has occurred or that a disaster is imminent or threatened, the governor shall, by proclamation, declare a condition of disaster emergency. The disaster emergency remains in effect until the governor finds that the danger has passed or the disaster has been dealt with so that the emergency no longer exists. The governor may terminate the disaster emergency by proclamation. A proclamation of disaster emergency may not remain in effect longer than 30 days unless extended by the legislature by a concurrent resolution. The proclamation must indicate the nature of the disaster, the area threatened or affected, and the conditions that have brought it about or that make possible the termination of the disaster emergency. A proclamation to declare a condition of disaster emergency must also state whether the governor proposes to expend state funds to respond to the disaster under (i) or (j) of this section.

An order or proclamation issued under AS

26.23.010

—

26.23.220

shall be disseminated promptly by means calculated to bring its contents to the attention of the general public and, unless prevented or impeded by circumstances attendant upon the disaster, promptly filed with the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management, the lieutenant governor, and the municipal clerk in the area to which it applies.

A proclamation of a disaster emergency activates the disaster response and recovery aspects of the state, local, and interjurisdictional disaster emergency plans applicable to the political subdivisions or areas in question, and constitutes authority for the deployment and use of any force to which the plan or plans apply and for use or distribution of any supplies, equipment, materials, and facilities assembled, stockpiled, or arranged to be made available under AS

26.23.010

—

26.23.220

or any other provision of law relating to disaster emergency response.

During the effective period of a disaster emergency, the governor is commander in chief of the organized and unorganized militia and of all other forces available for emergency duty. The governor may delegate or assign command authority by appropriate orders or regulations.

In addition to any other powers conferred upon the governor by law, the governor may, under AS

26.23.010

—

26.23.220

,

suspend the provisions of any regulatory statute prescribing procedures for the conduct of state business, or the orders or regulations of any state agency, if compliance with the provisions of the statute, order, or regulation would prevent, or substantially impede or delay, action necessary to cope with the disaster emergency;

use all available resources of the state government and of each political subdivision of the state as reasonably necessary to cope with the disaster emergency;

transfer personnel or alter the functions of state departments and agencies or units of them for the purpose of performing or facilitating the performance of disaster emergency services;

subject to any applicable requirements for compensation under AS

26.23.160

, commandeer or utilize any private property, except for all news media other than as specifically provided for in AS

26.23.010

—

26.23.220

, if the governor considers this necessary to cope with the disaster emergency;

direct and compel the relocation of all or part of the population from any stricken or threatened area in the state if the governor considers relocation necessary for the preservation of life or for other disaster mitigation purpose;

prescribe routes, modes of transportation, and destinations in connection with necessary relocation;

control ingress to and egress from a disaster area, the movement of persons within the area, and the occupancy of premises in it;

suspend or limit the sale, dispensing, or transportation of alcoholic beverages, explosives, and combustibles;

make provisions for the availability and use of temporary emergency housing;

allocate or redistribute food, water, fuel, clothing, medicine, or supplies; and

use money from the oil and hazardous substance release response account in the oil and hazardous substance release prevention and response fund, established by AS

46.08.010

, to respond to a declared disaster emergency related to an oil or hazardous substance discharge.

The governor may expend during a fiscal year not more than $500,000 of state funds per incident to prevent, minimize, or respond to the effects of an incident that may occur or occurs in the state and that, in the determination of the governor, poses a direct and imminent threat of sufficient magnitude and severity to justify state action. Before expending funds under this subsection to respond to an incident, the governor shall provide a financing plan to cope with the incident to the legislature in the same manner prescribed for disaster emergencies under AS

26.23.025(a)

.

If the governor declares a condition of disaster emergency, the governor may expend during a fiscal year not more than $1,000,000 of state funds per disaster declaration, including the assets of the disaster relief fund, to

save lives, protect property and public health and safety, or lessen or avert the threat of the disaster that poses a direct and imminent threat of sufficient severity and magnitude to justify state action;

implement provisions of law relating to disaster relief to cope with the disaster;

alleviate the effects of the disaster by making grants or loans to persons or political subdivisions on terms the governor considers appropriate or by other means the governor considers appropriate.

If the disaster described in the governor’s proclamation to declare a condition of disaster emergency is a fire, the governor may expend state funds as necessary to save lives or protect property and public health and safety.

The governor may expend more than $500,000 of state funds to cope with an incident under (h) of this section or more than $1,000,000 of state funds to cope with a disaster under (i) of this section under the following circumstances:

if the legislature is in session, the legislature approves a financing plan to cope with the incident or disaster that identifies the amount in excess of the expenditure limits that is to be expended from state funds; or

if the legislature is not in session, either

the governor convenes a special session of the legislature within five days after declaring the condition of disaster emergency or within five days after providing a financing plan to cope with an incident to the legislature and the legislature convenes in special session and approves a financing plan to cope with the incident or disaster that identifies the amount in excess of the expenditure limits that is to be expended from state funds; or

the presiding officers of both the house of representatives and the senate agree that a special session should not be convened and so advise the governor in writing.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1977; am § 1 ch 178 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 190 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 128 SLA 1994; am §§ 2, 3 ch 4 SLA 2000; am § 16 ch 179 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1992, “AS

26.23.010

—

26.23.220

” was substituted for “this chapter” in several places in this section to reflect the 1990 enactment of AS

26.23.300

and

26.23.400

.

In 2004, in (d) of this section, “division of emergency services” was changed to “division of homeland security and emergency management” in accordance with § 26(b), ch. 179, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For catastrophic oil discharges as disaster emergencies without a declaration of disaster, see AS

46.04.080

; for intent of legislature in enacting (h) - (k), see § 1, ch. 4, SLA 2000 in the 2000 Temporary and Special Acts.

For temporary provisions relating to the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared March 11, 2020, see ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.
For legislative approval of a financing plan to cope with that disaster, see § 3, ch. 10, SLA 2020.
For department authority to establish sanitation procedures for retail sellers during the public health disaster emergency, see § 17, ch. 10, SLA 2020.

For temporary provisions relating to the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared January 15, 2021, see ch. 2, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts. For limitations on the governor’s powers to respond to that disaster, see sec. 3, ch. 2, SLA 2021. For emergency powers of the commissioner of health and social services, see sec. 4, ch. 2, SLA 2021. For legislative approval of a financing plan to cope with that disaster, see sec. 5, ch. 2, SLA 2021. For a report to be submitted by the office of management and budget relating to the total expenditures incurred by the state in response to the COVID-19 public health disaster, see sec. 6, ch. 2, SLA 2021.

Administrative Code. —

For 1998 western Alaska fisheries disaster emergency disaster assistance, see 6 AAC 94, art. 1.

For individual and family disaster grants, see 6 AAC 94, art. 2.

For temporary housing assistance, see 6 AAC 94, art. 3.

Sec. 26.23.025.
The legislature and disaster emergencies.

When the governor declares a condition of disaster emergency under AS

26.23.020(c)

, concurrently with the issuance of the proclamation, the governor shall prepare and deliver to the presiding officers of the legislature and to the persons who chair the finance committees in each house of the legislature a financing plan describing the amount by fund source of money, including the amount of state match for federal funds, that the governor proposes to use to cope with the disaster, the estimated total expenditures necessary to cope with the disaster, and the estimated time frame necessary to cope with the disaster.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if the declaration of a disaster emergency occurs while the legislature is in session or if a special session is held, actions taken by the governor under this chapter after the close of the session that are not ratified by law adopted during that session are void.

The legislature may terminate a disaster emergency at any time by law.

History.

(§ 2 ch 178 SLA 1990; am § 4 ch 4 SLA 2000)

Sec. 26.23.030.
Creation of the Alaska division of emergency services. [Repealed, § 22 ch 179 SLA 2004.]

Sec. 26.23.040.
Homeland security duties of the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management.

The Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management shall prepare and maintain a state emergency plan and keep it current. The plan may include provisions for

prevention and minimization of injury and damage caused by disasters;

prompt and effective response to disasters;

emergency relief;

identification of geographical areas, municipalities, cities or villages especially vulnerable to a disaster;

recommendations for

zoning, building, and other land use controls;

safety measures for securing mobile homes or other nonpermanent or semi-permanent structures; and

other preventive and preparedness measures designed to eliminate or reduce disasters or their impact;

assistance to local officials in designing local emergency action plans;

authorization and procedures for the construction of temporary works designed to protect against or mitigate danger, damage, or loss from a disaster;

organization of manpower and chains of command;

coordination of federal, state, and local disaster activities;

coordination of the state emergency plan with the disaster plans of the federal government; and

other matters necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

The Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management shall play an integral part in the development and revision of local and interjurisdictional disaster plans prepared under AS

26.23.060

and

26.23.500

—

26.23.549

. To this end, it may employ or otherwise secure the services of professional and technical personnel capable of providing expert assistance to political subdivisions, their disaster agencies, and representatives of interjurisdictional disaster planning and service areas. These personnel shall consult with political subdivisions and agencies on a regular basis and shall make field examinations of the areas, circumstances, and conditions to which particular local and interjurisdictional disaster plans are intended to apply and may suggest or require revisions.

In preparing and maintaining the state emergency plan, the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management shall seek the advice and assistance of local government, business, labor, industry, agriculture, civic and volunteer organizations and community leaders. In advising local and interjurisdictional disaster planners, the office shall encourage them also to seek advice from these sources.

The state emergency plan or any part of it may be incorporated in regulations or orders of the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management. Regulations and orders of the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management have the force and effect of law.

The Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management shall

determine requirements of the state and its political subdivisions for food, clothing, and other necessities in the event of a disaster emergency;

procure and pre-position supplies, medicines, materials, and equipment;

adopt standards and requirements for local and interjurisdictional disaster plans;

periodically review local and interjurisdictional disaster plans;

establish and operate, or assist political subdivisions, their disaster agencies, and representatives of interjurisdictional disaster planning and service areas to establish and operate, training programs;

plan and make arrangements for the availability and use of any private facilities, services, and property and, if necessary and if in fact used, provide for payment for use under terms and conditions agreed upon by the parties;

establish a register of persons with types of training and skills important in disaster prevention, preparedness, response, and recovery;

prepare, for issuance by the governor, orders, proclamations, and regulations as necessary or appropriate in coping with disasters;

cooperate with the federal government and any public or private agency or entity in achieving any purpose of this chapter and in implementing programs for disaster prevention, preparedness, response, and recovery;

develop and carry out procedures and policies to effectively employ disaster relief funds made available by the governor’s authority or by special legislative action; these procedures shall include application and documentation by disaster victims or applicants, review, verification and funding approval, and processing of appeals;

do other things necessary or proper for the implementation of this chapter;

coordinate the operation of the Alaska intrastate mutual aid system among participating political subdivisions of the state and develop, in coordination with the political subdivisions and appropriate state and federal agencies, comprehensive guidelines and procedures for the Alaska intrastate mutual aid system, including record keeping and reimbursement procedures and forms for use by political subdivisions requesting and providing assistance;

to the extent that money is available from an appropriation for the purposes of this paragraph,

award grants for the purpose of forming local emergency planning committees under AS

26.23.073

;

in order to comply with 49 U.S.C. 5116(a)(2)(B), make funds available to local emergency planning committees for developing and maintaining emergency plans under AS

26.23.073

and

26.23.075

;

make funds available to local emergency planning committees to implement 42 U.S.C. 11022(e) and 42 U.S.C. 11044; and

award grants for training local emergency planning committees and for training and equipping the emergency response organizations identified in the local plans that execute the plans developed by the committees under AS 26.23.073 and

26.23.075

.

To the extent that the plan prepared under this section relates to action required to avert human injury or other damage from a release of a hazardous substance, the plan must be substantially equivalent in relevant respect to the local emergency plans prepared under AS

26.23.073

and

26.23.075

and the state and regional master plans prepared by the Department of Environmental Conservation under AS

46.04.200

—

46.04.210

. The plan must use an incident command system comparable to the system used in those plans and must be reviewed by the Alaska State Emergency Response Commission under AS

26.23.077

.

The Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management has the additional powers and duties set out in AS

26.20.025

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1977; am §§ 3, 4 ch 178 SLA 1990; am §§ 1 — 4 ch 32 SLA 1994; am § 17 ch 179 SLA 2004; am § 19 ch 12 SLA 2006; am §§ 1, 2 ch 67 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in various places throughout this section, “division of emergency services” was changed to “division of homeland security and emergency management” in accordance with § 26(b),
ch. 179, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For 1998 western Alaska fisheries disaster emergency disaster assistance, see 6 AAC 94, art. 1.

For individual and family disaster grants, see 6 AAC 94, art. 2.

For temporary housing assistance, see 6 AAC 94, art. 3.

Editor's notes. —

Subparagraph (e)(13)(B) references former 49 U.S.C. § 5116(a)(2)(B), which has been amended; the current comparable provision is found in paragraph (a)(3) of that section.

Sec. 26.23.045.
Response corps; depots.

The department may establish a response corps. The corps consists of volunteers who register with the department and agree to be trained in techniques for emergency and disaster response and to be available on short notice to carry out responsibilities of the corps under an applicable incident command system. Members of the corps are entitled to per diem and expenses as determined by the department for training and for days spent in service to the state.

The department may maintain emergency response depots in areas of the state identified for that purpose in the state emergency plan developed under AS

26.23.040

. The depots shall be equipped in a manner that enables prompt response to emergencies and disasters.

History.

(§ 5 ch 32 SLA 1994)

Sec. 26.23.050.
Financing.

It is the intent of the legislature, and declared to be the policy of the state, that funds to meet disaster emergencies will always be available.

Whenever, and to the extent that, money is needed to cope with a disaster, the first recourse shall be to money regularly appropriated to state and local agencies. The second recourse shall be to money available in the disaster relief fund or, for oil or hazardous substances discharges, the oil and hazardous substance release prevention and response fund, as the governor determines appropriate. If money available from these sources is insufficient, and if the governor finds that other sources of money to cope with the disaster are not available or are insufficient, the governor may, notwithstanding the limitations imposed by AS

37.07.080(e)

,

transfer and spend money appropriated for other purposes; or

borrow money for a term not to exceed two years.

Nothing in this section limits the governor’s authority to apply for, receive, administer, and spend grants, gifts, or payments from any source, to aid in disaster prevention, preparedness, response, or recovery.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1977; am § 3 ch 59 SLA 1986; am § 5 ch 178 SLA 1990; am § 2 ch 190 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 36 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For temporary provisions relating to the COVID-19 pubic health disaster emergency declared January 15, 2021, see ch. 2, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts. For legislative approval of a financing plan to cope with that disaster, see sec. 5, ch. 2, SLA 2021.

Administrative Code. —

For 1998 western Alaska fisheries disaster emergency disaster assistance, see 6 AAC 94, art. 1.

For individual and family disaster grants, see 6 AAC 94, art. 2.

For temporary housing assistance, see 6 AAC 94, art. 3.

Sec. 26.23.060.
Local and interjurisdictional disaster services.

Each political subdivision in the state is within the jurisdiction of, and shall be served by, the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management.

Each political subdivision is responsible for disaster preparedness and coordination of response

by itself;

in conjunction with other political subdivisions by establishing an interjurisdictional planning and service area under AS

26.23.070

; or

in conjunction with the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management.

Each political subdivision that has not established the ability to mitigate, prepare for, respond to, and recover from disasters shall designate, and provide to the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management the name of, a liaison officer to facilitate the cooperation and protection of that political subdivision in the work of disaster prevention, preparedness, response, and recovery.

The principal executive officer of each political subdivision in the state shall notify the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management of the manner in which the political subdivision is providing or securing disaster planning and intends to provide or secure emergency services, identify the person who heads the agency from which the services are or will be obtained, and furnish additional information relating to the services as the Alaska division of homeland security and emergency management requires.

Each political subdivision shall ensure that a written local or interjurisdictional disaster emergency plan for its area is prepared, maintained, and distributed to all appropriate officials. The disaster emergency plan must include a clear and complete statement of the emergency responsibilities of all local agencies and officials.

[Repealed, § 28 ch 32 SLA 1994.]

To the extent that a plan prepared under this section relates to action required to avert human injury or other damage from a release of a hazardous substance, the plan must be substantially equivalent in relevant respects, including the use of a comparable incident command system, to the local emergency plans prepared under AS

26.23.073

and

26.23.075

and the state and regional master plans prepared by the Department of Environmental Conservation under AS

46.04.200

—

46.04.210

. The plan must use an incident command system comparable to the system used in those plans and must be reviewed by the Alaska State Emergency Response Commission under AS

26.23.077

.

Notwithstanding the definition of “political subdivision” in AS

26.23.900

, this section does not empower a political subdivision to perform responsibilities that it is not otherwise empowered to perform. In this section, “political subdivision” includes only a political subdivision that is otherwise empowered to perform the responsibilities assigned under this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1977; am §§ 6, 7 ch 178 SLA 1990; am §§ 6 — 10, 28 ch 32 SLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in various places throughout this section, “division of emergency services” was changed to “division of homeland security and emergency management” in accordance with § 26(b),
ch. 179, SLA 2004.

Sec. 26.23.070.
Establishment of interjurisdictional disaster planning and service areas.

If the governor finds that two or more adjoining political subdivisions would be better served by an interjurisdictional arrangement than by maintaining separate disaster agencies and services, the governor may designate by order an interjurisdictional area adequate to plan for, prevent, or respond to a disaster in that area, and direct steps to be taken as necessary, including the creation of an interjurisdictional relationship, a joint disaster emergency plan, mutual aid, or an area organization for emergency planning and services. A finding by the governor under this subsection must be based on one or more factors related to the difficulty of maintaining an efficient and effective disaster prevention, preparedness, response, and recovery system without an interjurisdictional relationship, such as

small or sparse population;

limitations on public financial resources severe enough to make maintenance of a separate disaster agency and services unreasonably burdensome;

unusual vulnerability to disaster as evidenced by a past history of disasters, topographical features, drainage characteristics, disaster potential, and presence of disaster-prone facilities or operations;

the interrelated character of the political subdivisions in an area; or

other relevant conditions or circumstances.

If the governor finds that a vulnerable area lies only partly within the state and includes territory in a foreign jurisdiction, and that it would be desirable to establish an international relationship, mutual aid, or an area organization for disaster, the governor shall take steps to that end as desirable. If this action is taken with jurisdictions that have enacted the Emergency Management Assistance Compact substantially as contained in AS

26.23.136

, any resulting agreement may be considered a supplementary agreement under Article VII of that compact.

If a jurisdiction with which the governor proposes to cooperate under (b) of this section has not enacted the Emergency Management Assistance Compact, the governor may negotiate a special agreement with that jurisdiction.

To the extent that a plan prepared under this section relates to action required to avert human injury or other damage from a release of a hazardous substance, the plan must be substantially equivalent in relevant respect to the local emergency plans prepared under AS

26.23.073

and

26.23.075

and the state and regional master plans prepared by the Department of Environmental Conservation under AS

46.04.200

—

46.04.210

. The plan must use an incident command system comparable to the system used in those plans and must be reviewed by the Alaska State Emergency Response Commission under AS

26.23.077

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 104 SLA 1977; am § 11 ch 32 SLA 1994; am § 2 ch 55 SLA 2002; am § 34 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Sec. 26.23.071.
Alaska State Emergency Response Commission.

The Alaska State Emergency Response Commission is established in the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs.

The commission consists of the commissioners of commerce, community, and economic development, environmental conservation, fish and game, health and social services, labor and workforce development, natural resources, public safety, and transportation and public facilities, or the designees of the commissioners, the adjutant general of the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs or a designee, and seven members of the public appointed by the governor, two of whom must be members of a local emergency planning committee for an emergency planning district that is predominantly rural in character and two of whom must be members of a local emergency planning committee for an emergency planning district that is predominantly urban in character. Two of the other three members of the public who are appointed to the commission must be members of the governing body of, or the mayor of, a political subdivision that has a local emergency planning committee or a person who, in the opinion of the governor, is otherwise appropriate to represent the political subdivision. The United States Department of Defense — Alaska Command, the Federal Emergency Management Agency, the United States Environmental Protection Agency, and the United States Coast Guard may each appoint a representative to serve on the commission in an ex-officio, nonvoting capacity. To the extent practicable, the commission must include members with expertise in the emergency response field.

The adjutant general of the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs, or the adjutant general’s designee, and the commissioner of environmental conservation, or the commissioner’s designee, shall co-chair the commission. The Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs shall provide staff support to the commission.

Members of the commission other than those from the designated state departments serve at the pleasure of the governor for staggered terms of three years. Members of the commission serve without compensation but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized for members of boards and commissions under AS

39.20.180

.

The commission shall

serve as the state emergency response commission required under 42 U.S.C. 11001 — 11005;

facilitate the preparation and implementation of all emergency plans prepared by state agencies under other authorities; the statewide, interjurisdictional, and local plans prepared under this chapter, including the Alaska intrastate mutual aid system; and the state and regional plans prepared under AS

46.04.200

—

46.04.210

;

review the plans described in (2) of this subsection according to the criteria established in AS

26.23.077

;

designate, and revise as necessary, the boundaries of emergency planning districts under AS

26.23.073

;

establish a local emergency planning committee under AS

26.23.073(d)

for each emergency planning district;

supervise and coordinate the activities of local emergency planning committees;

establish procedures for receiving and processing requests from the public for information under 42 U.S.C. 11044, including tier II information under 42 U.S.C. 11022; procedures established under this paragraph shall designate the Department of Environmental Conservation as the state agency to receive and process these requests on behalf of the commission;

review reports about responses to disaster emergencies and make recommendations to the appropriate parties involved in the response concerning improved prevention and preparedness;

perform other coordinating, advisory, or planning tasks related to emergency planning and preparedness for all types of hazards, community right-to-know reporting, toxic chemical release reporting, or management of hazardous substances;

recommend procedures to integrate, as appropriate, hazardous substance response planning under 42 U.S.C. 11001 — 11005, federal contingency planning under 33 U.S.C. 1321 and other federal laws applicable to hazardous substance discharges, and state, regional, and local planning under this chapter and AS

46.04.200

—

46.04.210

;

to the extent consistent with the constitution and law of the state, perform all other functions prescribed for state emergency response commissions under 42 U.S.C. 11001 — 11005; and

adopt regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of AS

26.23.071

—

26.23.077

,

26.23.500

—

26.23.549

, and 42 U.S.C. 11001 — 11005.

History.

(§ 12 ch 32 SLA 1994; am § 4 ch 71 SLA 1997; am § 3 ch 67 SLA 2012)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (a) was rewritten in 1994 to conform to the style of the Alaska Statutes.

In 1999, in (b) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was substituted for “commissioner of community and regional affairs” in accordance with § 91(a)(6), ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in subsection (b), “labor and workforce development” was substituted for “labor” in accordance with ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, in (b) of this section, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Administrative Code. —

For municipality of Anchorage reporting requirements, see 10 AAC 20, art. 1.

Sec. 26.23.073.
Emergency planning districts and committees.

The commission shall set the boundaries of local emergency planning districts. The commission shall set the boundaries of a district so that they are coextensive with the boundaries of a single political subdivision except when it would be more appropriate, based on findings of the commission, for the district to include more than one political subdivision or some area that is not contained within a political subdivision. Before the commission sets the boundaries for a district under this subsection so that it includes more than one political subdivision or some area that is not within a political subdivision, the commission shall consult the emergency response organizations and the political subdivisions in the proposed district.

If, after the commission sets boundaries for districts under (a) of this section, there remain areas of the state that are not included in any district, those areas constitute a local emergency planning district.

If the commission sets boundaries for a district under this section that includes more than one political subdivision, the commission shall recommend to the governor the designation of an interjurisdictional disaster planning and service area under AS

26.23.070

whose boundaries are coextensive with the boundaries of the local emergency planning district established under this section.

The commission shall appoint the members of a local emergency planning committee for each emergency planning district established under (a) and (b) of this section. In making appointments for a district that contains only one political subdivision, the commission shall follow the recommendations of the political subdivision if those recommendations would constitute a committee that meets the requirements of this subsection. In making appointments for a district that contains more than one political subdivision, the commission shall consider the recommendations of each political subdivision and follow the recommendations to the extent that the political subdivisions are in agreement and their recommendations would constitute a committee that meets the requirements of this subsection. To the extent required under regulations that may be adopted by the commission, the political subdivisions in a district that includes more than one political subdivision shall follow a process under which they develop coordinated recommendations to submit to the commission under this subsection. In making appointments for a district that includes some area that is not contained within a political subdivision, the commission shall consider the recommendations of emergency response organizations in the district. In making appointments for the district formed under (b) of this section, the commission shall attempt to achieve equitable geographical representation on the committee. Except as provided in (e) of this section, each committee must include, at a minimum, representatives of each of the following seven categories:

elected local officials;

law enforcement, civil defense, fire fighting, first aid, health, local environmental, hospital, and transportation personnel;

broadcast or print media;

community groups;

owners and operators of facilities subject to the requirements of 42 U.S.C. 11001 — 11005;

representatives of a local or interjurisdictional disaster planning and service area if one has been established that includes part of the district; and

members of the public that are not described in (1) — (6) of this subsection.

If advertisement and the commission’s own initiative do not result in the acceptance of appointment to a committee by at least one person from a category under (d)(1) — (7) of this section, the requirement of (d) of this section that there be representation of that category on that committee is suspended until sufficient willing appointees become available.

A person may request the commission to change the membership of a local emergency planning committee.

Each local emergency planning committee shall

establish procedures for receiving and processing requests from the public for information under 42 U.S.C. 11044, including tier II information under 42 U.S.C. 11022;

appoint a chair and establish rules by which the committee shall function, including provisions for public notification of committee activities, public advertising of positions available on the committee, public meetings to discuss the emergency plan, public comments, response to the comments by the committee, distribution of the emergency plan, and designation of an official to serve as coordinator for information;

prepare and periodically review an emergency plan in accordance with 42 U.S.C. 11003(a) in a manner that includes coordination with the political subdivisions covered by the plan;

evaluate the need for resources necessary to develop, implement, and exercise the emergency plan, and submit recommendations to the political subdivisions in the emergency planning district with respect to the resources that may be required and the means for providing the resources;

to the extent consistent with the constitution and law of the state, perform all other functions prescribed for emergency planning committees in 42 U.S.C. 11001 — 11005;

to the extent considered advisable by the committee, make recommendations to political subdivisions, representatives of interjurisdictional disaster planning and service areas, and state agencies about the preparation of local, state, and interjurisdictional plans; and

serve as an advisory committee to the political subdivisions within the emergency planning district or the interjurisdictional planning and service area established under AS

26.23.070

with respect to emergency planning, training, and response.

A state agency represented on the commission shall, upon request, provide technical assistance to a local emergency planning committee in the performance of its duties under this section.

History.

(§ 12 ch 32 SLA 1994)